Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXII Ownership and Conveyance of Property
Forcible Entry and Detainer

383.200.
Definitions of forcible entry and detainer.

The words “possession,” “entry,” “detainer,” in KRS

383.200

to

383.285

, refer to lands and tenants.

A forcible entry is:

An entry without the consent of the person having the actual possession;

As to landlord, an entry upon the possession of his tenant at will or by sufferance, whether with or without the tenant’s consent.

A forcible detainer is:

The refusal of a tenant to give possession to his landlord after the expiration of his term; or of a tenant at will or by sufferance to give possession to the landlord after the determination of his will;

The refusal of a tenant of a person who has made a forcible entry to give possession, on demand, to the person upon whose possession the forcible entry was made;

The refusal of a person who has made a forcible entry upon the possession of one who acquired it by a forcible entry to give possession, on demand, to him upon whose possession the first forcible entry was made;

The refusal of a person who has made a forcible entry upon the possession of a tenant for a term to deliver possession to the landlord, upon demand, after the term expires; and, if the term expires whilst a writ of forcible entry sued out by the tenant is pending, the landlord may, at his cost and for his benefit, prosecute it in the name of the tenant.

History.

C. C. 452: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

383.205.
Time when tenancy created immaterial.

It is not material whether the tenant shall have received possession from his landlord or have become his tenant after obtaining possession.

History.

C.C. 453: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

383.210.
Issual and form of warrant — Jury not summoned unless demanded.

Upon complaint by a person aggrieved by a forcible entry or detainer to the District Court of the county in which the land or tenement, or a principal part thereof, lies, a warrant shall issue to the sheriff or any constable, in substance as follows: “The Commonwealth of Kentucky to the sheriff (or any constable) of . . . . . county: Whereas, A B hath made complaint that C D and E F did, on the . . . . . . day of . . . . . , forcibly enter into (or forcibly detain from the said A B) one (1) house and field on the waters of . . . . . , in the county aforesaid (or other general description of the lands or tenements), which were in the peaceable possession of A B (or which the said C D and E F, tenants of the said A B, now hold against him): You are, therefore, commanded to summon a good and lawful jury of your county to meet on the premises, or at a place convenient thereto, on the . . . . . day of . . . . . , to inquire into the forcible entry (or forcible detainer) aforesaid; and give to the said C D and E F at least three (3) days’ notice of the time and place of the meeting of the jury; and have then there this writ. Witness, etc.”

In the trial of writs of forcible entry, forcible detainer or forcible entry and detainer, if neither party, in person or by agent or attorney, demand a jury, the trial thereof shall be by the court. No such writ shall hereafter direct the summoning of a jury, and the sheriff or other officer to whose hands such writ may come to do execution thereof shall not summon a jury in such proceedings, unless he be by either party notified in writing that a jury is demanded. At the calling of the cause for trial either party may demand a jury.

History.

C.C. 454: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 312, effective January 2, 1978.

383.215.
Execution of warrant.

The officer shall give to each defendant notice, according to the directions of the warrant, and no inquiry shall be made against any defendant who has not been notified as aforesaid. If, however, the notice have been given to a defendant, but not three (3) days before the day of the meeting of the jury, the inquest shall, on his motion, be adjourned until the expiration of the three (3) days.

History.

C. C. 455: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

383.220.
Return of warrant — Jury — Oath.

At the time for holding the inquisition, the officer shall return the warrant to the court with an indorsement stating when and upon whom it was executed and the place designated by the officer for holding the inquisition, together with a panel of the jury; whereupon, the clerk, whether the defendant is present or not, shall administer an oath to the jurors in substance as follows: “You, and each of you, shall well and truly inquire into and return whether or not the defendant (or defendants) is (or are) guilty of the forcible entry (or detainer) complained of in the warrant in this cause: so help you God.”

History.

C.C. 456: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 313, effective January 2, 1978.

383.225.
Duties of judge or justice. [Repealed.]

383.230.
Witnesses, subpoenas and coercion of attendance.

The court may issue subpoenas for witnesses at the request of either party, and their attendance and testifying may be coerced by the court which conducts the inquest.

History.

C.C. 458: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 314, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 111, effective June 17, 1978.

383.235.
Verdict — Procedure in case of disagreement.

The jurors, after hearing the evidence, shall, by their inquest, say whether the defendants, or either of them, be guilty or not guilty of the forcible entry or detainer complained of; and shall return their inquest, signed by one of their body, to the court. If the jury do not agree, it may be discharged, and another be ordered to be summoned to meet, either immediately or at some future day to be then and there fixed and indorsed on the warrant; and this proceeding shall be continued until a jury agree.

History.

C.C. 459: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 315, effective January 2, 1978.

383.240.
Form of judgment.

Upon the return of the inquest the court shall enter a judgment according to the inquisition, either for the plaintiff, in substance, that he have restitution of the premises aforesaid, and recover of the defendants his costs in this behalf expended; or for the defendants, in substance, that they recover of the plaintiff their costs in this behalf expended; or for the plaintiff against some of the defendants, and for the other defendants against the plaintiff, if some be found guilty and others not guilty.

History.

C.C. 460: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 316, effective January 2, 1978.

383.245.
Proceedings upon failure to file appeal — Form and issual of warrant of restitution.

If the party against whom the inquisition is found fails to file an appeal of the inquisition with the court, on or before the seventh day after the finding of the inquest, the court shall, on request, issue execution for the costs; and, if the inquisition be in favor of the plaintiff, it shall also issue a warrant of restitution in substance as follows: “ _________
County. To the sheriff (or any constable) of
_________
county, Whereas, C D and E F have been found guilty of a forcible entry in (or detainer of) one house and field, lying on the waters of
_________ , in the county aforesaid (or other general description of the possessions), to the injury of A B: You are, therefore, in the name of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, commanded that, with the power of the county if necessary, you put the said A B in the possession of said premises; and make return within
_________
days, how you have executed this warrant. Given under my hand this
_________
day of
_________ .

_______________________________________ District Judge”

History.

C.C. 461: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 317, effective January 2, 1978.

383.250.
Preservation of papers, records and proceedings — Transcript.

The clerk of the court shall carefully preserve all papers, records and proceedings, relating to the cause; and shall deliver, to any person requiring it, a transcript thereof.

History.

C.C. 462: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 318, effective January 2, 1978.

383.255.
Time for filing appeal — Deposit of money with clerk — Return of papers or transcript to circuit court.

If either party conceive himself aggrieved by the judgment of the court, he may file an appeal within seven (7) days next after the finding aforesaid, and shall deposit with the circuit court clerk the amount of rent owing and due from the onset of the forcible entry and detainer proceedings as well as the amount of all future rents, as it becomes owing and due in each succeeding month during the pendency of the appeal. The rental moneys collected in this account shall be distributed by court order at the conclusion of an appeal.

Upon the aggrieved party perfecting his appeal by the payment of moneys into court pursuant to subsection (1) of this section the court shall stay all further proceedings on the inquisition, and return the whole of the papers and proceedings, or a fair transcript thereof, to the office of the circuit court of said county, within ten (10) days thereafter.

History.

C.C. 463: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 319, effective January 2, 1978.

383.260.
Recovery of damages and expenses.

Upon this deposit, if the appellant fails to prosecute his appeal, he and his surety shall be liable for the damages for withholding the possession which the appellee may be entitled to recover against the appellant, during the pendency of the appeal, either in the Circuit Court or Court of Appeals, as well as the reasonable expenses of the appellee in defending the appeal.

History.

C.C. 464: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 320, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 112, effective June 17, 1978.

383.265.
Proceedings on traverse. [Repealed.]

383.270.
Proceedings on judgments of circuit court.

After a cause is returned to the circuit court, execution for cost, or for restitution, shall issue from the office of that court, according to the judgment in the cause.

History.

C.C. 466: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

383.275.
Restraint of waste.

The court before whom such cause may be pending may restrain waste or destruction of the premises, and may enforce its order by fine and imprisonment or either.

History.

C.C. 467: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 321, effective January 2, 1978.

383.280.
Actions for trespass, waste, rent or profits not barred.

The proceedings under a writ of forcible entry or detainer shall not bar an action for trespass or waste or rent or mesne profits.

History.

C.C. 468: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

383.285.
Limitation of action.

No inquisition of forcible entry or forcible detainer shall be taken at any time after two (2) years from the forcible entry or detainer complained of.

History.

C.C. 469: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.